North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-12 Trial, General Provisions [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure and
transferred to other sections of the Code]

28-12-01.
Trial — Definition. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-12-02.
Origin and classes of issues. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-12-03.
Issues of law. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-12-04.
Issues of fact classified. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-12-05.
Order of trial. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-12-06.
By whom triable. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 38, 39.

28-12-07.
Issues — When, where, and how tried. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 40.

28-12-08.
Note of issue, contents — Notice of trial — Order of trial. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 40.

28-12-09.
Order of trial. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-12-10.
Continuance — Motions for — Affidavits. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-12-11.
When party or attorney is member of legislative assembly. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 54-03-22.

28-12-12.
Either party proceeds. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 40.

28-12-13.
Separate trials. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 20, 42.

28-12-14.
How jury waived. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 38.

28-12-15.
Consolidating actions. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 42.